test/src/morphology/N-cahcahkayo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - cahcahkayo - ok : # -m animate noun, blackbird
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg: cahcahkayo
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl: cahcahkayowak
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Loc: cahcahkayohk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg: cahcahkayosis
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl: cahcahkayosisak

     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicahcahkayo
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicahcahkayo
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocahcahkayo
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: ocahcahkayoyiw
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicahcahkayonân
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicahcahkayonân
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskâw
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskâw
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: ocahcahkayoyiw

     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niôsa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicahcahkayok
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: ocahcahkayo
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: ocahcahkayoyiwa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicahcahkayonâna
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicahcahkayonawa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicahcahkayowâwa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: ocahcahkayowâwa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: ocahcahkayoyiwa

     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nicahcahkayosis
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kicahcahkayosis
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: ocahcahkayosis
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: ocahcahkayosisiyiw
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nicahcahkayosisinân
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kicahcahkayosisinaw
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kicahcahkayosisiwâw
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: ocahcahkayosisiwâw
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: ocahcahkayosisiyiw

     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nicahcahkayosisa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kicahcahkayosisa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: ocahcahkayosisa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: ocahcahkayosisiyiwa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nicahcahkayosisinâna
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kicahcahkayosisinawa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kicahcahkayosisiwâwa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: ocahcahkayosisiwâwa
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: ocahcahkayosisiyiwa

     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicahcahkayohk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicahcahkayohk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocahcahkayohk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: ocahcahkayoyihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisinânihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicahcahkayonâhk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisiwâwihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osiwâwihk 
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: ocahcahkayoyihk

     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: nicahcahkayosisihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc: kicahcahkayosisihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: ocahcahkayosisihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: ocahcahkayossiyihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: nicahcahkayosisnânihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kicahcahkayossinâh
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kicahcahkayosiswâwihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: ocahcahkayosiswâwihk
     cahcahkayo+N+AN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: ocahcahkayosisiyihk
